Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [103F.226] PUBLIC ROAD END; PROHIBITED USE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "public road end" means the terminus at a lake, pond, flowage, river, or stream of a road that is lawfully open for use by the public. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin A public road end must not be used for any of the following unless a recorded deed, recorded easement, or other recorded dedication expressly provides otherwise: new text end new text begin (1) constructing, installing, maintaining, or using boat hoists or boat anchorage devices; new text end new text begin (2) mooring or docking a boat between midnight and sunrise; new text end new text begin (3) activity that obstructs ingress to or egress from the body of water; or new text end new text begin (4) constructing, installing, maintaining, or using a dock or wharf other than a single seasonal public dock or wharf that is owned and maintained by a municipality or county. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin A person who violates subdivision 2 is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day on which the violation continues or is repeated constitutes a separate offense. new text end